District of Columbia statutes.
38-702

Books remain District property.

All books purchased by the Board of Education shall be held as property of the District of Columbia and shall be loaned to pupils under such conditions as the Board of Education may prescribe.

Jan. 31, 1930, 46 Stat. 62, ch. 32, § 2
1981 Ed., § 31-702.
1973 Ed., § 31-402.